sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Tillbehör till fria vikter > Ställ för hantlar och viktskivor: Förvaringsställ för skivstänger; Hantelställ; Kettlebellställ; Flerfunktionsställ för förvaring; Viktskivsställ
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Akcesoria do wolnych ciężarów > Stojaki na ciężary: Stojaki na gryfy i sztangi; Stojaki na hantle; Stojaki na kettlebelle; Wielofunkcyjne stojaki na sprzęt; Stojaki na talerze obciążeniowe
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Free Weight Accessories > Free Weight Storage Racks: Barbell Storage Racks; Dumbbell Racks; Kettlebell Racks; Multi-Purpose Storage Racks; Weight Plate Trees
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > อุปกรณ์ฟรีเวท > ชั้นวางอุปกรณ์ฟรีเวท: ชั้นวางบาร์เบล; ชั้นวางดัมเบล; ชั้นวางเคตเทิลเบล; ชั้นวางอเนกประสงค์; ชั้นวางแผ่นน้ำหนักทรงต้นไม้
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Accessoires de musculation avec des poids libres > Rack de rangement pour poids libres: Racks de rangement pour barres de musculation; Racks pour haltères; Racks pour kettlebells; Racks de rangement multifonctions; Arbres pour disques de poids
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Acessórios de pesos livres > Suportes de armazenamento de pesos livres: Estantes de arrumação para barras de musculação; Estantes para halteres; Estantes para kettlebells; Estantes de arrumação multiusos; Suportes para discos de peso
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Acessórios de pesos > Estantes para pesos livres: Prateleiras de armazenamento para barras; Prateleiras para halteres; Prateleiras para kettlebells; Prateleiras de armazenamento multiuso; Suportes tipo árvore para anilhas
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské činky > Stojany na uloženie činiek: Stojany na činky; Stojany na činky; Stojany na kettlebell; Univerzálne regály na skladovanie; Stojany na závažia
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 프리웨이트 부대용품 > 프리웨이트 보관대: 바벨 보관 랙; 덤벨 랙; 케틀벨 랙; 다목적 보관 랙; 웨이트 플레이트 트리
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Laisvųjų svarsčių priedai > Laisvųjų svarsčių laikymo lentynos: Svarmenų štangų laikymo stovai; Hantelių stelažai; Svarmenų stelažas; Daugiafunkciai sandėliavimo stelažai; Svarmenų lėkščių stovai
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Dodatki za proste uteži > Stojala za shranjevanje prostih uteži: Stojala za shranjevanje uteži na palici; Stojalo za utežne ročke; Stojala za uteži Kettlebell; Večnamenska stojala za shranjevanje; Drevesa za ploščate uteži
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 哑铃/杠铃配件 > 哑铃架: 杠铃收纳架; 哑铃架; 壶铃架; 多用途收纳架; 杠铃片架
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Accesorios para pesas libres > Estantes de almacenamiento de pesas libres: Estantes de almacenamiento para barras de pesas; Estantes para mancuernas; Estantes para pesas rusas; Estantes de almacenamiento multiusos; Soportes tipo árbol para discos de pesas
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Vapaiden painojen lisätarvikkeet > Vapaiden painojen säilytyshyllyt: Levytankojen säilytystelineet; Käsipainotelineet; Kahvakuulatelineet; Monikäyttöiset säilytystelineet; Levypainotelineet
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Hantelzubehör > Hantelständer: Langhantelständer; Kurzhantelständer; Kettlebell-Ständer; Mehrzweck-Ablageständer; Hantelscheibenständer
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 自由重量健身配件 > 自由重量訓練器材架: 槓鈴收納架; 啞鈴收納架; 壺鈴收納架; 多功能收納架; 槓片收納架
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Phụ kiện tạ tay > Giá cất giữ tạ đơn: Giá để đòn tạ; Giá để tạ tay; Giá để tạ ấm; Giá để đồ đa năng; Giá để bánh tạ
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Αξεσουάρ ελεύθερων βαρών > Ράφια αποθήκευσης ελεύθερων βαρών: Ράφια αποθήκευσης μπαρών; Ράφια αποθήκευσης αλτήρων; Ράφια αποθήκευσης kettlebell; Ράφια αποθήκευσης πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Βάσεις αποθήκευσης δίσκων βαρών
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Accesorii pentru greutăți libere > Suporturi pentru depozitare greutăți libere: Rastele de depozitare pentru bare de haltere; Rafturi pentru gantere; Rafturi pentru kettlebell; Rafturi multifuncționale de depozitare; Suporturi tip copac pentru discuri de greutate
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Accessori per massa muscolare > Rastrelliere per pesi liberi: Scaffali per bilancieri; Scaffali per manubri; Scaffali per kettlebell; Scaffali multiuso; Alberi porta-dischi
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Аксесоари за свободни тежести > Стелажи за съхранение на свободни тежести: Стойки за съхранение на щанги; Стойки за дъмбели; Стелажи за пудовки; Многофункционални стелажи за съхранение; Стойки за тежести
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Frivektstilbehør > Lagringsstativer for frivekter: Oppbevaringsstativer for vektstenger; Manualstativer; Kettlebell-stativer; Flerbruksstativer for oppbevaring; Vektsskivestativer
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > フリーウエイト関連用品 > フリーウエイト収納ラック: バーベル収納ラック; ダンベルラック; ケトルベルラック; 多目的収納ラック; ウェイトプレートツリー
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Přílušenství k činkám > Stojan na činky: Stojany na osy činek; Stojany na jednoručky; Stojany na kettlebelly; Víceúčelové stojany; Stojany na kotouče
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Accessoires voor gewichtheffen > Opslagrekken voor losse gewichten: Halterstangopbergrekken; Halterrekken; Kettlebell-rekken; Multifunctionele opbergrekken; Halterschijvenbomen
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Serbest Ağırlık Aksesuarları > Serbest Ağırlık Saklama Rafları: Halter barı depolama stantları; Dambıl stantları; Kettlebell stantları; Çok amaçlı depolama stantları; Ağırlık plakası ağaç stantları
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Håndvægte – tilbehør > Stativer til frivægte: Opbevaringsstativer til vægtstænger; Håndvægtstativer; Stativer til kettlebells; Opbevaringsstativer til flere formål; Vægtskivestativer
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Szabadsúly-kiegészítők > Szabadsúly-tárolóállványok: Súlyzórúd-tároló állványok; Kézisúlyzó-tároló állványok; Kettlebell-tároló állványok; Többcélú tárolóállványok; Súlytárcsatartó állványok
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Dodaci za podesive utege > Police za skladištenje utega: Stalci za pohranu za šipku; Stalci s bučicama; Stalci za girje; Višenamjenski stalci za pohranu; Stalci za ploče s utezima
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Аксессуары для свободных весов > Стойки для хранения свободных весов: Стойки для хранения штанг и грифов; Стойки для гантелей; Стойки для гирь; Универсальные стойки для хранения инвентаря; Стойки для дисков